Rhode Island, session 2025, SB479.
It is enacted by the General Assembly as follows:
SECTION 1. Chapter 27-18 of the General Laws entitled "Accident and Sickness Insurance
Policies" is hereby amended by adding thereto the following section:
27-18-95. Certified professional midwife.
(a) As used in this section, “certified professional midwife” or “CPM” means a trained
professional who has successfully completed an accredited educational program in midwifery,
holds a current certification as a certified professional midwife by the North American Registry of
Midwives (hereinafter referred to in this section as “NARM”), and is licensed to practice midwifery
in accordance with § 23-13-9.
(b) Every individual or group health insurance contract, or every individual or group
hospital or medical expense insurance policy, plan, or group policy delivered, issued for delivery,
or renewed in this state on or after January 1, 2026, shall provide coverage for the services of a
certified professional midwife in accordance with each health insurers' respective principles and
mechanisms of reimbursement, credentialing, and contracting, if the services are within the
certified professional midwife’s area of professional competence as defined by the standard
developed and maintained by the Midwives Alliance of North America (hereinafter referred to in
this section as “MANA”) in collaboration with the department of health, and are currently
reimbursed when rendered by any other healthcare provider. No insurer or hospital or medical
service corporation may require supervision, signature, or referral by any other healthcare provider
as a condition of reimbursement, except when those requirements are also applicable to other

categories of healthcare providers. No insurer or hospital or medical service corporation or patient
shall be required to pay for duplicate services actually rendered by both a licensed certified
professional midwife and any other healthcare provider.
(c) Every individual or group health insurance contract, or every individual or group
hospital or medical expense insurance policy, plan, or group policy delivered, issued for delivery,
or renewed in this state that is required to cover certified professional midwife services defined in
subsections (a) and (b) of this section, shall report utilization and cost information related to
licensed certified professional midwife’s services to the office of the health insurance
commissioner on or before July 1, 2026 and each July 1 thereafter. The office of the health
insurance commissioner shall define the utilization and cost information required to be reported.
(d) This section shall not apply to insurance coverage providing benefits for:
(1) Hospital confinement indemnity;
(2) Disability income;
(3) Accident only;
(4) Long-term care;
(5) Medicare supplement;
(6) Limited benefit health;
(7) Specified disease indemnity;
(8) Sickness or bodily injury or death by accident or both; and
(9) Other limited benefit policies.
(e) Notwithstanding any general or special law to the contrary, unless otherwise specified,
the provisions of this chapter shall supersede and shall control over any conflicting or inconsistent
laws, including general laws, special laws, or local laws, or any rule or regulation of the state
including, but not limited to, §§ 23-13-9, 27-41-2(21), 27-41-36 or any other state rule or
regulation.
SECTION 2. Chapter 27-19 of the General Laws entitled "Nonprofit Hospital Service
Corporations" is hereby amended by adding thereto the following section:
27-19-87. Certified professional midwife.
(a) As used in this section, “certified professional midwife” or “CPM” means a trained
professional who has successfully completed an accredited educational program in midwifery,
holds a current certification as a certified professional midwife by the North American Registry of
Midwives (hereinafter referred to in this section as “NARM”), and is licensed to practice midwifery
in accordance with § 23-13-9.
(b) Every individual or group health insurance contract, or every individual or group
LC001585 - Page 2 of 7

hospital or medical expense insurance policy, plan, or group policy delivered, issued for delivery,
or renewed in this state on or after January 1, 2026, shall provide coverage for the services of a
certified professional midwife in accordance with each health insurers' respective principles and
mechanisms of reimbursement, credentialing, and contracting, if the services are within the
certified professional midwife’s area of professional competence as defined by the standard
developed and maintained by the Midwives Alliance of North America (hereinafter referred to in
this section as “MANA”) in collaboration with the department of health, and are currently
reimbursed when rendered by any other healthcare provider. No insurer or hospital or medical
service corporation may require supervision, signature, or referral by any other healthcare provider
as a condition of reimbursement, except when those requirements are also applicable to other
categories of healthcare providers. No insurer or hospital or medical service corporation or patient
shall be required to pay for duplicate services actually rendered by both a licensed certified
professional midwife and any other healthcare provider.
(c) Every individual or group health insurance contract, or every individual or group
hospital or medical expense insurance policy, plan, or group policy delivered, issued for delivery,
or renewed in this state that is required to cover certified professional midwife services defined in
subsections (a) and (b) of this section, shall report utilization and cost information related to
licensed certified professional midwife’s services to the office of the health insurance
commissioner on or before July 1, 2026 and each July 1 thereafter. The office of the health
insurance commissioner shall define the utilization and cost information required to be reported.
(d) This section shall not apply to insurance coverage providing benefits for:
(1) Hospital confinement indemnity;
(2) Disability income;
(3) Accident only;
(4) Long-term care;
(5) Medicare supplement;
(6) Limited benefit health;
(7) Specified disease indemnity;
(8) Sickness or bodily injury or death by accident or both; and
(9) Other limited benefit policies.
(e) Notwithstanding any general or special law to the contrary, unless otherwise specified,
the provisions of this chapter shall supersede and shall control over any conflicting or inconsistent
laws, including general laws, special laws, or local laws, or any rule or regulation of the state
including, but not limited, to §§ 23-13-9, 27-41-2(21), 27-41-36 or any other state rule or
LC001585 - Page 3 of 7

regulation.
SECTION 3. Chapter 27-20 of the General Laws entitled "Nonprofit Medical Service
Corporations" is hereby amended by adding thereto the following section:
27-20-83. Certified professional midwife.
(a) As used in this section, “certified professional midwife” or “CPM” means a trained
professional who has successfully completed an accredited educational program in midwifery,
holds a current certification as a certified professional midwife by the North American Registry of
Midwives (hereinafter referred to in this section as “NARM”), and is licensed to practice midwifery
in accordance with § 23-13-9.
(b) Every individual or group health insurance contract, or every individual or group
hospital or medical expense insurance policy, plan, or group policy delivered, issued for delivery,
or renewed in this state on or after January 1, 2026, shall provide coverage for the services of a
certified professional midwife in accordance with each health insurers' respective principles and
mechanisms of reimbursement, credentialing, and contracting, if the services are within the
certified professional midwife’s area of professional competence as defined by the standard
developed and maintained by the Midwives Alliance of North America (hereinafter referred to in
this section as “MANA”) in collaboration with the department of health, and are currently
reimbursed when rendered by any other healthcare provider. No insurer or hospital or medical
service corporation may require supervision, signature, or referral by any other healthcare provider
as a condition of reimbursement, except when those requirements are also applicable to other
categories of healthcare providers. No insurer or hospital or medical service corporation or patient
shall be required to pay for duplicate services actually rendered by both a licensed certified
professional midwife and any other healthcare provider.
(c) Every individual or group health insurance contract, or every individual or group
hospital or medical expense insurance policy, plan, or group policy delivered, issued for delivery,
or renewed in this state that is required to cover certified professional midwife services defined in
subsections (a) and (b) of this section, shall report utilization and cost information related to
licensed certified professional midwife’s services to the office of the health insurance
commissioner on or before July 1, 2026 and each July 1 thereafter. The office of the health
insurance commissioner shall define the utilization and cost information required to be reported.
(d) This section shall not apply to insurance coverage providing benefits for:
(1) Hospital confinement indemnity;
(2) Disability income;
(3) Accident only;
LC001585 - Page 4 of 7

(4) Long-term care;
(5) Medicare supplement;
(6) Limited benefit health;
(7) Specified disease indemnity;
(8) Sickness or bodily injury or death by accident or both; and
(9) Other limited benefit policies.
(e) Notwithstanding any general or special law to the contrary, unless otherwise specified,
the provisions of this chapter shall supersede and shall control over any conflicting or inconsistent
laws, including general laws, special laws, or local laws, or any rule or regulation of the state
including, but not limited, to §§ 23-13-9, 27-41-2(21), 27-41-36 or any other state rule or
regulation.
SECTION 4. Chapter 27-41 of the General Laws entitled "Health Maintenance
Organizations" is hereby amended by adding thereto the following section:
27-41-100. Certified professional midwife.
(a) As used in this section, “certified professional midwife” or “CPM” means a trained
professional who has successfully completed an accredited educational program in midwifery,
holds a current certification as a certified professional midwife by the North American Registry of
Midwives (hereinafter referred to in this section as “NARM”), and is licensed to practice midwifery
in accordance with § 23-13-9.
(b) Every individual or group health insurance contract, or every individual or group
hospital or medical expense insurance policy, plan, or group policy delivered, issued for delivery,
or renewed in this state on or after January 1, 2026, shall provide coverage for the services of a
certified professional midwife in accordance with each health insurers' respective principles and
mechanisms of reimbursement, credentialing, and contracting, if the services are within the
certified professional midwife’s area of professional competence as defined by the standard
developed and maintained by the Midwives Alliance of North America (hereinafter referred to in
this section as “MANA”) in collaboration with the department of health, and are currently
reimbursed when rendered by any other healthcare provider. No insurer or hospital or medical
service corporation may require supervision, signature, or referral by any other healthcare provider
as a condition of reimbursement, except when those requirements are also applicable to other
categories of healthcare providers. No insurer or hospital or medical service corporation or patient
shall be required to pay for duplicate services actually rendered by both a licensed certified
professional midwife and any other healthcare provider.
(c) Every individual or group health insurance contract, or every individual or group
LC001585 - Page 5 of 7

hospital or medical expense insurance policy, plan, or group policy delivered, issued for delivery,
or renewed in this state that is required to cover certified professional midwife services defined in
subsections (a) and (b) of this section, shall report utilization and cost information related to
licensed certified professional midwife’s services to the office of the health insurance
commissioner on or before July 1, 2026 and each July 1 thereafter. The office of the health
insurance commissioner shall define the utilization and cost information required to be reported.
(d) This section shall not apply to insurance coverage providing benefits for:
(1) Hospital confinement indemnity;
(2) Disability income;
(3) Accident only;
(4) Long-term care;
(5) Medicare supplement;
(6) Limited benefit health;
(7) Specified disease indemnity;
(8) Sickness or bodily injury or death by accident or both; and
(9) Other limited benefit policies.
(e) Notwithstanding any general or special law to the contrary, the provisions of this
chapter shall supersede and shall control over any conflicting or inconsistent laws, including
general laws, special laws, or local laws, or any rule or regulation of the state including, but not
limited, to §§ 23-13-9, 27-41-2(21), 27-41-36 or any other state rule or regulation.
SECTION 5. This act shall take effect on January 1, 2026.
========
LC001585
========
LC001585 - Page 6 of 7